Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Boilers.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80.

Sec. 18.60.180.
Regulations.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall formulate definitions and regulations for the safe and proper construction, installation, repair, use, and operation of boilers and for the safe and proper construction, installation, and repair of unfired pressure vessels. The definitions and regulations must be based upon and shall follow the generally accepted nationwide engineering standards, formulae, and practices established for boiler and unfired pressure vessel construction and safety. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may adopt the existing published codification of these definitions and regulations, known as the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code, and may adopt the amendments and interpretations made and published by that society. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall adopt amendments and interpretations to the code immediately upon their adoption by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers so that the definitions and regulations at all times follow generally accepted nationwide engineering standards.

History.

(§ 1(c) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80, art. 1.

For operation controls, see 8 AAC 80, art. 2.

For special requirements for alterations or repair authorization, see 8 AAC 80, art. 3.

For requirements for boiler operator license, see 8 AAC 80, art. 4.

Sec. 18.60.190.
Effect of regulations.

The regulations adopted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development have the force and effect of law. However, the regulations applying to the construction of new boilers and unfired pressure vessels do not prevent their installation until the regulations become mandatory as provided in (b) of this section.

Amendments in the regulations are permissive immediately upon adoption and become mandatory 12 months after adoption.

History.

(§ 1(d) ch 132 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.200.
New boilers and unfired pressure vessels.

A power boiler, low pressure boiler, or unfired pressure vessel that does not conform to the regulations adopted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development governing new construction and installation may not be installed and operated unless it is of special design or construction, and is not covered by the regulations, or is not in any way inconsistent with the regulations, in which case the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may issue a special installation and operating permit.

A person who installs a boiler or unfired pressure vessel shall notify the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the installation, using a form provided by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.210.
Exemptions.

AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

do not apply to the following:

boilers and unfired pressure vessels under federal regulation;

unfired pressure vessels meeting the requirements of the federal Department of Transportation for shipment of liquids or gases under pressure;

air tanks located on vehicles operating under the regulations of another state authority and used for carrying passengers or freight;

air tanks installed on the right-of-way of railroads and used directly in the operation of trains;

unfired pressure vessels having a volume of five cubic feet or less or vessels having an inside diameter not exceeding six inches;

unfired pressure vessels designed for a pressure not exceeding 15 pounds per square inch when not located in a place of public assembly;

manually fired miniature boilers for model locomotive, boat, tractor, or stationary engines constructed or maintained as a hobby for exhibition use, having a volume less than five cubic feet and grate area less than two square feet and equipped with an American Society of Mechanical Engineers coded safety valve of adequate capacity and size, a water level indicator, and pressure gauge;

except as provided in (c) of this section, antique manually fired boilers of locomotive, boat, tractor, or stationary engines constructed or maintained as a hobby and equipped with an American Society of Mechanical Engineers coded safety valve of adequate capacity and size;

automatic utility hot water heaters that are used for space heating using the potable system, if the hot water heater

is equipped with a safety relief valve and operational controls required by the latest American Society of Mechanical Engineers Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers that has been adopted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS

18.60.180

;

contains only water;

does not exceed 120 gallons in capacity, a water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit, a pressure of 150 pounds of square inch gauge pressure, or a heat input of more than 200,000 BTU an hour; and

contains a tempering valve that will regulate the outlet domestic water temperature at not more than 140 degrees Fahrenheit.

The following boilers and unfired pressure vessels are exempt from the requirements of AS

18.60.320

—

18.60.360

:

boilers and unfired pressure vessels located on farms and used solely for agricultural purposes;

steam and hot water heating boilers, used exclusively for heating purposes, that are located in private residences or in apartment houses of fewer than six families;

unfired pressure vessels containing only cold water under pressure for domestic supply purposes, including those containing air, the compression of which serves only as a cushion or airlift pumping system;

unfired pressure vessels containing liquified petroleum gas;

unfired pressure vessels operating entirely full of water, and hot water supply boilers or domestic water heaters, if none of the following limitations is exceeded:

a heat input of 200,000 British thermal units per hour (57,143 watts);

a water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit (99 degrees centigrade);

a maximum water-containing capacity of 120 gallons (454.2 liters);

coil type boilers unless the water-containing capacity is six gallons (22.8 liters) or greater, the water temperature exceeds 350 degrees Fahrenheit (176.5 degrees centigrade), steam is generated in the coil, or the diameter of the tubing is greater than three-quarters of an inch (18.75 millimeters).

Notwithstanding (a)(8) of this section, an antique manually fired boiler may not be used for exhibition purposes without a special operating permit issued by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 4 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 1991; am § 24 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.220.
Duties of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

have all violators of AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

prosecuted;

issue, suspend, or revoke for cause, inspection certificates provided for in AS

18.60.390

;

take action necessary for the enforcement of the laws and regulations governing the use of boilers and unfired pressure vessels;

keep a complete record of the type, dimensions, maximum allowable working pressure, age, condition, location, and date of the last recorded internal inspection of boilers and unfired pressure vessels to which AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

apply;

adopt regulations establishing reasonable fees for administering special inspector examinations and for processing applications for special inspector commissions; and

do acts necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 47 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.230.
Appointment of deputy inspectors.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall employ deputy inspectors who have passed the examination provided for in AS

18.60.290

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.235.
Approved inspectors.

In addition to the deputy inspectors employed under AS

18.60.230

and the special inspectors commissioned under AS

18.60.240

, the commissioner of labor and workforce development may appoint an employee of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development as an approved inspector if the employee has completed training by the chief inspector and has passed an examination that has been approved by the director of the division of labor standards and safety to perform inspections under AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.395

of cast iron boilers and domestic hot water heaters. An employee does not have to pass the examination described in AS

18.60.290

in order to be appointed an approved inspector under this subsection.

The inspection authority of an approved inspector appointed under (a) of this section is limited to performing the inspections described in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 82 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of labor and workforce development” was substituted for “commissioner of labor” and “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” was substituted for “Department of Labor” to reconcile chs. 58 and 82, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.240.
Appointment and qualifications of special inspectors.

In addition to the deputy boiler inspectors provided for in AS

18.60.230

and the approved inspectors appointed under AS

18.60.235(a)

, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall, upon the request of a company authorized by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS 21.09 to insure against loss from explosion of boilers and unfired pressure vessels as described in AS

21.12.070(a)(7)

, or upon the request of a company operating unfired pressure vessels, issue to an inspector of the company a state commission as a special inspector. However, to be eligible for a commission as special inspector, a person must have passed the examination provided for in AS

18.60.290

, or hold a certificate as an inspector of boilers from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

History.

(§ 7(a) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80, art. 1.

Sec. 18.60.250.
Compensation for special inspectors prohibited.

A special inspector is not entitled to any compensation or expenses from the state.
A special inspector’s commission is conditioned upon continuing in the employ of a boiler insurance company or a company operating unfired pressure vessels in this state and upon maintaining the standards imposed by AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

.

History.

(§ 7(b) ch 132 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.60.260.
Duty of special inspectors.

Each special inspector shall inspect all boilers and unfired pressure vessels insured or operated by the inspector’s company.
The owner and user of a boiler or unfired pressure vessel inspected by its special inspector is exempt from the payment of the inspection fees provided in AS

18.60.360

.

History.

(§ 7(c) ch 132 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.60.270.
Report of inspection; fee.

Each company employing a special inspector shall, within 15 days following each inspection for certification as required by AS

18.60.390

for a boiler or unfired pressure vessel, file a report of the inspection with the department.

In addition, a special inspector shall file with the department a report of an inspection that discloses a condition dangerous to life or property in a boiler or unfired pressure vessel. The special inspector shall file the report within 15 days following the inspection.

A company or special inspector who files a report under this section shall enter the report directly into the department’s electronic inspection report system or submit the report to the department on a form provided by the department. The department shall charge a company or special inspector a fee of $10 for filing a report if the company or special inspector does not file the report by entering the report directly into the department’s electronic inspection report system.

The department shall deposit the fees collected under (c) of this section in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

.

In this section, “department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 7(d) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 11 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to this section, see sec. 5, ch. 11, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, in (a), substituted “within 15 days” for “within 30 days”, and deleted “department of labor and workforce development upon forms adopted by the” following “report of the inspection with the”; in (b), added the second sentence; added (c) – (e).

Sec. 18.60.280.
Right of inspection.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development or a deputy or special inspector shall be given free access, during reasonable hours, to any premises where a boiler or unfired pressure vessel is being constructed, installed, or operated, for the purpose of determining whether the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is constructed, installed, and operated in accordance with AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

.

An approved inspector appointed under AS

18.60.235(a)

has the right of access provided in (a) of this section, but only for the purpose of making the determinations described in (a) of this section for a cast iron boiler or domestic hot water heater.

History.

(§ 7(e) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.290.
Examination for deputy and special inspectors.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall give the examination for the position of deputy inspector or special inspector using the standard National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors examination.
The examination shall be in writing. If an applicant fails to pass the examination, the applicant may appeal to the department for another examination, which shall be given by the department within the next calendar quarter.
The applicant and the applicant’s employer shall have access to the record of an applicant’s examination.

History.

(§ 8(a) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.300.
Revocation or suspension of state commission.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may, after investigation, suspend or revoke a commission for (1) incompetence, (2) conviction of the crime of bribery under AS

11.56.100

, receiving a bribe under AS

11.56.110

, or perjury under AS

11.56.200

, in connection with work as a special or deputy inspector, or (3) intentional falsification of any material matter or statement in the application or in an inspection report or in an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the enforcement of AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.395

. A person whose commission has been suspended or revoked may apply to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for reinstatement. The department may refuse to reinstate a commission for a person whose license was suspended or revoked.

A person whose commission has been suspended or revoked, or whose application for reinstatement has been denied, may appeal the suspension, revocation, or denial as provided in AS

18.60.370

and is entitled to be present and represented by counsel at the hearing.

History.

(§ 8(b) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 21 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.310.
Replacement of lost or destroyed certificate or commission.

If a certificate or commission is lost or destroyed the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall issue a new certificate or commission without another examination.

History.

(§ 8(c) ch 132 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.315.
Inspection standards.

Unless the Department of Labor and Workforce Development establishes by regulation a different edition, the most current edition of the National Board Inspection Code Manual for Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors constitutes the minimum boiler and pressure vessel inspection standard of the state for boilers and pressure vessels after they have received their initial inspection certificates from the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may adopt regulations for the maximum practical implementation of the manual and may grant an exception from a specific provision of the manual when the department determines that the implementation of the provision would be impractical.

History.

(§ 1 ch 157 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80, art. 1.

For special requirements for alterations or repair authorization, see 8 AAC 80, art. 3.

Sec. 18.60.320.
Inspection of boilers and unfired pressure vessels.

Each boiler and unfired pressure vessel used or proposed to be used in the state except boilers or unfired pressure vessels exempt under AS

18.60.210

shall be inspected as to construction, installation, condition, and operation, as follows:

power boilers and high pressure or high temperature water boilers shall be given a certificate inspection annually; the inspector may conduct an external inspection while the boiler is under pressure or an internal inspection if warranted;

low pressure steam or vapor heating boilers shall be given a certificate inspection biennially with an internal inspection every four years if its construction permits an internal inspection;

hot water heating, hot water supply, and coil heating boilers shall be given a certificate inspection biennially with an internal inspection at the discretion of the inspector;

each unfired pressure vessel shall be inspected internally and externally at intervals set by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; an internal inspection of an unfired pressure vessel is not required if its contents are known to be noncorrosive to the material of which the shell, head, or fittings are constructed, either from the chemical composition of the contents or from evidence that the contents are adequately treated with a corrosion inhibitor, and if the vessel is constructed in accordance with

regulations of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, if any, in effect at the time of manufacture;

standards set out in the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code in effect at the time of manufacture until September 6, 1981; or

if the department adopts subsequent revisions of that code, the standards set out in those revisions as adopted by the department and in effect at the time of manufacture.

A grace period of two months beyond periods specified in (a)(1) — (4) of this section may elapse between certificate inspections.

History.

(§ 9(a) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.330.
Rules of inspection.

Each inspection under AS

18.60.320

shall be made by a deputy inspector employed under AS

18.60.230

, an approved inspector appointed under AS

18.60.235(a)

, or by a special inspector commissioned under AS

18.60.240

.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 37 SLA 1992.]

History.

(§ 9(b) — (e) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 21 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 37 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1999)

Sec. 18.60.340.
Inspection certificates.

If, upon inspection, a boiler or an unfired pressure vessel complies with the regulations of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the owner or user shall pay to the department a certificate fee to be established by regulation by the commissioner of labor and workforce development. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall issue to the owner or user an inspection certificate showing the date of inspection and specifying the maximum pressure under which the boiler or unfired pressure vessel may be operated. The certificate shall be posted in a location convenient to the boiler or unfired pressure vessel.

A company authorized by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS 21.09 to insure boilers or unfired pressure vessels shall notify the Department of Labor and Workforce Development each time it discontinues the insurance for a boiler or unfired pressure vessel located in the state. The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall terminate the inspection certificate and require a reinspection if the insurance was terminated because of a condition dangerous to life or property.

History.

(§ 10(a), (b) ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1966; am §§ 9, 10 ch 21 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80, art. 1.

Sec. 18.60.350.
Suspension of inspection certificate.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may suspend an inspection certificate when, in its opinion, the boiler or unfired pressure vessel for which it was issued cannot be operated without menace to the public safety, or when the boiler or unfired pressure vessel does not comply with the regulations.
A special inspector has this same power to suspend an inspection certificate for an insured boiler or unfired pressure vessel or an unfired pressure vessel operated by the company employing the special inspector.
Suspension of an inspection certificate continues in effect until reinstatement. A certificate may not be reinstated until the boiler or unfired pressure vessel conforms to the rules and regulations of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 10(c) ch 132 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.360.
Inspection fees.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall, by regulation, establish reasonable fees to be charged for the inspection of boilers and unfired pressure vessels. Separate fees may be established for external inspection, internal inspection, shop inspection, and hydrostatic tests, and fees may vary depending upon the rated power, heating surface area, or cross sectional area of boilers and unfired pressure vessels.

The owner or user of a boiler or unfired pressure vessel that is inspected by a deputy inspector employed under AS

18.60.230

or an approved inspector appointed under AS

18.60.235(a)

shall pay the department, upon completion of the inspection, the appropriate inspection fee established under (a) of this section.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall give an official receipt for an inspection fee collected under this section and shall transfer the amount of the fee to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

in the state treasury.

In this section, “fee” does not include the filing fee charged under AS

18.60.270(c)

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1968; am § 11 ch 21 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 82 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For boiler and pressure vessel construction code, see 8 AAC 80, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 18.60.370.
Appeals.

A person aggrieved by an order or act of a deputy inspector employed under AS

18.60.230

or an approved inspector appointed under AS

18.60.235(a)

may, within 15 days after notice of the order or act, appeal to the commissioner of labor and workforce development. The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner’s designee shall hold a hearing within 30 days of the appeal but shall give at least 10 days’ written notice of the hearing to all interested parties. Within 30 days after the hearing, the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner’s designee shall issue an order approving or disapproving the order or act and shall give a copy of the order to all interested parties. Within 30 days after the order of the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner’s designee, a person aggrieved may file an appeal in the superior court for review. The court shall summarily hear the appeal and may make an appropriate order or decree.

History.

(§ 14 ch 132 SLA 1955; am § 25 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 82 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.380.
Creation of boiler fund.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 29 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 18.60.390.
Inspection certificate required; penalty.

A person may not operate a boiler or unfired pressure vessel under pressure without a valid inspection certificate as provided for in AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.390

.
The operation of a boiler or unfired pressure vessel without an inspection certificate, or at a pressure exceeding that specified in the inspection certificate, is a misdemeanor and the owner, user, or operator is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both. Each day of unlawful operation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 11 ch 132 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.60.395.
Licensing of boiler operators; fees.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall adopt regulations for the licensing of boiler operators. The regulations must conform to the generally accepted nationwide standards and practices established for boiler operators. In addition to any requirements adopted by regulation under this subsection, a person applying for a license shall provide to the department, on the application, the person’s social security number.

Operators’ licenses shall be provided in the following categories:

fireman — apprentice,

third class — boiler capacity not to exceed 3,500 pounds of steam an hour or 3,500,000 British thermal units per hour for high temperature or high pressure water boilers,

second class — boiler capacity not to exceed 100,000 pounds of steam an hour or 100,000,000 British thermal units per hour for high temperature or high pressure water boilers,

first class — unlimited.

This section does not require a person to be licensed in order to be a boiler operator.

Upon request, the department shall provide a social security number provided under (a) of this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

A person shall pay a nonrefundable application fee of $200 when applying for a license as a boiler operator. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1970; am §§ 12, 13 ch 21 SLA 1981; am §§ 27, 28 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in (b)(1) of this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989. That change was in error, because this section addresses fires that heat boilers, not those that burn buildings. The error was corrected in 1994.

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for boiler operator license, see 8 AAC 80, art. 4.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 87, SLA 2004 (SB 278), adding subsection (e) to this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 1993 - 1994.